test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_O_NoExtra_waabooz_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px3waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: owaaboozensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3waabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: owaaboozensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: owaaboozenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: owaaboozenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: owaaboozenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: owaaboozenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: owaaboozenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: owaaboozenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: owaaboozenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: owaaboozenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: owaaboozenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: owaaboozenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: owaaboozenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: owaaboozenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: owaaboozenhimishiniibanan
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: owaaboozenhimishiniibanag
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: owaaboozenhimishiniibaning
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: owaaboozenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: owaaboozenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: owaaboozenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
